Idaho, session 2026, S1330.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 1-2301, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
1-2301. SMALL CLAIMS DEPARTMENT -- CREATION -- SCOPE OF CLAIMS --
VENUE. In every magistrate's division of the district court of this state,
the district court may create and organize a "Small Claims Department of
the Magistrate's Division," which shall have jurisdiction in cases for the
recovery of money where the amount of each claim does not exceed five fifteen
thousand dollars ($5,000) ($15,000), and in cases for the recovery of per-
sonal property where the value of the property does not exceed five fifteen
thousand dollars ($5,000) ($15,000); provided however, that the small
claims department shall not award punitive damages or damages for pain or
suffering in any proceeding. Any action brought in a small claims department
of the magistrate's division shall be brought in the magistrate's division
in the county where the defendant resides or the county where the cause of ac-
tion arose. A defendant may request a change of venue if an action is brought
in an improper county.
SECTION 2. That Section 1-2311, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
1-2311. APPEAL TO LAWYER MAGISTRATE. If either party is dissatisfied,
he may, within thirty (30) days from the entry of said judgment against him,
appeal to a lawyer magistrate other than the magistrate who entered said
judgment; and if the final judgment is rendered against him by such lawyer
magistrate, then he shall pay, in addition to any judgment rendered in the
magistrate's division, an attorney's fee to the prevailing party in the sum
of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) as provided in section 12-120(6), Idaho
Code, provided, however, that appeals from such small claims department
shall be allowed only in such cases as appeals would be allowed if the action
were instituted in the magistrate's division as is now provided, and further
provided that the appeal shall be heard in the county wherein the original
small claim was filed. A fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be paid by
the party taking the appeal, which shall be paid to the county treasurer who
shall, within fifteen (15) days after the end of the month, pay such fees to
the state treasurer for deposit into the court technology fund.


SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.